Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.280

Place of membership meetings.

Meetings of members shall be held at the place as provided in the bylaws; and if no provision is made, in the city where the principal place of business is located at a place designated by the board of directors.

[ 1959 c 312 s 28.]